Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201858-843
Bonds; secured by trust indenture; contents; expenses;
how treated.

In the discretion of the authority
any bonds issued under the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance Authority
Act may be secured by a trust indenture, which trust indenture may be
in the form of a bond resolution or similar contract, by and between
the authority and a corporate trustee or trustees
which may be any financial
institution having the power of a trust company or any trust company within or outside the state. Such
trust indenture providing for the
issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the revenue to be received or
proceeds of any contract or contracts pledged and may convey or mortgage the
project or any portion thereof. The
trust indenture by which a pledge is created or an assignment made shall be
filed in the records of the authority.

Any pledge or assignment made by the authority pursuant to
this section shall be valid and binding from the time that the pledge or assignment
is made, and the revenue so pledged and thereafter received by the authority
shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge or assignment without
physical delivery thereof or any further act. The lien of such pledge or assignment
shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in
tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority irrespective of whether
such parties have notice thereof.

Such trust indenture
may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee
or trustees, may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders, and may
contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies
of the bondholders and of the
trustee or trustees as may be reasonable and proper, not in violation
of law, or provided for in the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social
Services Finance Authority Act. Any such trust indenture may contain such
other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security
of the bondholders.

Any bank or trust company which acts as depository of the proceeds
of the bonds, any revenue, or other money shall furnish such indemnifying
bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the authority.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such
trust indenture may be treated as
a part of the cost of the operation of a project.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 40;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 20;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2940;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 40;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1740;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 43.